Arkansas, session 2025, HB1060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 16, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-16-156. Communism and autocratic government education — Update to existing
standards — Definition.
(a) Prior to the 2026-2027 school year, the Department of Education
shall review and update current social studies standards for grades seven
through twelve (7-12) in all public schools to include age-appropriate
adjustments in order to ensure curricula, standards, materials, and units
accurately compare and contrast the resiliency of the United States's
constitutional republic with the failures of communism and autocratic
government systems and other democratic government systems.
*TNL016*
02-10-2025 09:57:00 TNL016

As Engrossed: H1/15/25 H1/28/25 H2/10/25 HB1060
(b) The updated standards under subsection (a) of this section shall
include the following without limitation:
(1) The adherence to constitutional limitation in the United
States Government;
(2) The value of an educated citizenry and its ability to alter
government direction via elections;
(3) The general subservience of constitutional republics to the
citizens, while other forms of government require subservience to a single
government institution or a single government leader;
(4) The record of mass murder and oppression committed as a
result of communism and autocratic governments;
(5) The economic structures and related collapses of the
economic structures in countries that have adopted communism and autocratic
government policies or systems;
(6) The issues and failures associated with communism and
autocratic governments;
(7) The continued failure of communism and autocratic
governments resulting from the direct influences of the following without
limitation:
(A) The Union of Soviet Socialist Republics and its
successor state, Russia;
(B) The People's Republic of China;
(C) Democratic People's Republic of Korea; and
(D) Argentina; and
(8) The natural deterioration of democracies into autocracies
over history, including without limitation in Afghanistan, the Democratic
Republic of the Congo, Haiti, Somalia, Sudan, and Yemen.

(c) As used in this section, “communism and autocratic
government" means a system of government in which absolute power over a state
is concentrated in the hands of a single person or party, whose decisions are
subject to neither external legal constraints nor regularized mechanisms of
popular control.


/s/R. Scott Richardson
02-10-2025 09:57:00 TNL016